Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-714
River basin, subbasin, or reach; stay on new appropriations; notifications required; hearing; natural resources district; duties; status change; Chief Water Officer; natural resources district; duties.

(1) Whenever the Chief Water Officer makes a preliminary determination that a river basin, subbasin, or reach not previously designated as overappropriated and not previously determined to be fully appropriated has become fully appropriated, the Chief Water Officer shall place an immediate stay on the issuance of any new natural-flow, storage, or storage-use appropriations in such river basin, subbasin, or reach. The Chief Water Officer shall also provide prompt notice of such preliminary determination to all licensed water well contractors in the state and to each natural resources district that encompasses any of the geographic area involved. Such notice to natural resources districts shall be by certified mail. The notice shall be addressed to the manager of the natural resources district or his or her designee and shall include the signature of the Chief Water Officer. Immediately upon receipt of such notice by the natural resources district, there shall be a stay on issuance of water well construction permits in the geographic area preliminarily determined by the Chief Water Officer to include hydrologically connected surface water and ground water in such river basin, subbasin, or reach. The Chief Water Officer shall also notify the public of the preliminary determination that the river basin, subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated and of the affected geographic area. Such notice shall be provided by publication once each week for three consecutive weeks in at least one newspaper of statewide circulation and in such other newspaper or newspapers as are deemed appropriate by the Chief Water Officer to provide general circulation in the river basin, subbasin, or reach.

(2) If the Chief Water Officer preliminarily determines a river basin, subbasin, or reach to be fully appropriated and has identified the existence of hydrologically connected surface water and ground water in such river basin, subbasin, or reach, stays shall also be imposed:

(a) On the construction of any new water well in the area covered by the determination unless a permit with conditions imposed by the natural resources district has been issued prior to the determination. Such conditions shall meet the objectives of subsection (4) of section 46-715 and may include, but are not limited to, conditions in accordance with subsection (6) of section 46-739. Any well constructed pursuant to such permit shall be completed in accordance with section 46-738; and

(b) On the use of an existing water well or an existing surface water appropriation in the affected area to increase the number of acres historically irrigated.

Such additional stays shall begin ten days after the first publication, in a newspaper of statewide circulation, of the notice of the preliminary determination that the river basin, subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated.

(3) Exceptions to the stays imposed pursuant to subsection (1), (2), (8), or (9) of this section shall exist for (a) test holes, (b) dewatering wells with an intended use of one year or less, (c) monitoring wells, (d) wells constructed pursuant to a ground water remediation plan under the Environmental Protection Act, (e) water wells designed and constructed to pump fifty gallons per minute or less, except that no two or more water wells that each pump fifty gallons per minute or less may be connected or otherwise combined to serve a single project such that the collective pumping would exceed fifty gallons per minute, (f) water wells for range livestock, (g) new surface water uses or water wells that are necessary to alleviate an emergency situation involving the provision of water for human consumption or public health and safety, (h) water wells defined by the applicable natural resources district as replacement water wells, but the consumptive use of any such replacement water well can be no greater than the historic consumptive use of the water well it is to replace or, if applicable, the historic consumptive use of the surface water use it is to replace, (i) new surface water uses and water wells to which a right or permit is transferred in accordance with state law, but the consumptive use of any such new use can be no greater than the historic consumptive use of the surface water use or water well from which the right or permit is being transferred, (j) water wells and increases in ground water irrigated acres for which a variance is granted by the applicable natural resources district for good cause shown, (k) subject to any conditions imposed by the applicable natural resources district, to the extent permitted by the applicable natural resources district, increases in ground water irrigated acres that result from the use of water wells that were permitted prior to the effective date of the determination made in subsection (1) of this section and completed in accordance with section 46-738 but were not used for irrigation prior to that effective date, (l) to the extent permitted by the applicable natural resources district, increases in ground water irrigated acres that result from the use of water wells that are constructed after the effective date of the stay in accordance with a permit granted by that natural resources district prior to the effective date of the stay, (m) surface water uses for which temporary public-use construction permits are issued pursuant to subsection (8) of section 46-233, (n) surface water uses and increases in surface water irrigated acres for which a variance is granted by the Chief Water Officer for good cause shown, and (o) water wells for which permits have been approved by the Chief Water Officer pursuant to the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act prior to the effective date of the stay.

(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any stay imposed pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall remain in effect for the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach until the Chief Water Officer has made a final determination regarding whether the river basin, subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated and, if the Chief Water Officer's final determination is that the river basin, subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated, shall remain in effect as provided in subsection (11) of this section. Within the time period between the dates of the preliminary and final determinations, the Chief Water Officer and the affected natural resources districts shall consult with any irrigation district, reclamation district, public power and irrigation district, mutual irrigation company, canal company, or municipality that relies on water from the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach and with other water users and stakeholders as deemed appropriate by the Chief Water Officer or the natural resources districts. The Chief Water Officer shall also hold one or more public hearings not more than ninety days after the first publication of the notice required by subsection (1) of this section. Notice of the hearings shall be provided in the same manner as the notice required by such subsection. Any interested person may appear at such hearing and present written or oral testimony and evidence concerning the appropriation status of the river basin, subbasin, or reach, the Chief Water Officer's preliminary conclusions about the extent of the area within which the surface water and ground water supplies for the river basin, subbasin, or reach are determined to be hydrologically connected, and whether the stays on new uses should be terminated.

(5) Within thirty days after the final hearing under subsection (4) of this section, the Chief Water Officer shall notify the appropriate natural resources districts of the Chief Water Officer's final determination with respect to the appropriation status of the river basin, subbasin, or reach. If the final determination is that the river basin, subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated, the Chief Water Officer, at the same time, shall (a) decide whether to continue or to terminate the stays on new surface water uses and on increases in the number of surface water irrigated acres and (b) designate the geographic area within which the Chief Water Officer considers surface water and ground water to be hydrologically connected in the river basin, subbasin, or reach and describe the methods and criteria used in making that determination. The Chief Water Officer shall provide notice of the decision to continue or terminate the stays in the same manner as the notice required by subsection (1) of this section.

(6) Within ninety days after a final determination by the Chief Water Officer that a river basin, subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated, an affected natural resources district may hold one or more public hearings on the question of whether the stays on the issuance of new water well permits, on the construction of new water wells, or on increases in ground water irrigated acres should be terminated. Notice of the hearings shall be published as provided in section 46-743.

(7) Within forty-five days after a natural resources district's final hearing pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, the natural resources district shall decide (a) whether to terminate the stay on new water wells in all or part of the natural resources district subject to the stay and (b) whether to terminate the stay on increases in ground water irrigated acres. If the natural resources district decides not to terminate the stay on new water wells in any geographic area, it shall also decide whether to exempt from such stay the construction of water wells for which permits were issued prior to the issuance of the stay but for which construction had not begun prior to issuance of the stay. If construction of water wells for which permits were issued prior to the stay is allowed, all permits that were valid when the stay went into effect shall be extended by a time period equal to the length of the stay.

(8) Whenever the Chief Water Officer designates a river basin, subbasin, or reach as overappropriated, each previously declared moratorium on the issuance of new surface water appropriations in the river basin, subbasin, or reach shall continue in effect. The Chief Water Officer shall also provide prompt notice of such designation to all licensed water well contractors in the state and to each natural resources district that encompasses any of the geographic area involved. Immediately upon receipt of such notice by a natural resources district, there shall be a stay on the issuance of new water well construction permits in any portion of such natural resources district that is within the hydrologically connected area designated by the Chief Water Officer. The Chief Water Officer shall also notify the public of the Chief Water Officer's designation of such river basin, subbasin, or reach as overappropriated and of the geographic area involved in such designation. Such notice shall be published once each week for three consecutive weeks in at least one newspaper of statewide circulation and in such other newspapers as are deemed appropriate by the Chief Water Officer to provide general notice in the river basin, subbasin, or reach.

(9) Beginning ten days after the first publication of notice under subsection (8) of this section in a newspaper of statewide circulation, there shall also be stays (a) on the construction of any new water well in the hydrologically connected area if such construction has not commenced prior to such date and if no permit for construction of the water well has been issued previously by either the Chief Water Officer or the natural resources district, (b) on the use of an existing water well in the hydrologically connected area to increase the number of acres historically irrigated, and (c) on the use of an existing surface water appropriation to increase the number of acres historically irrigated in the affected area.

(10) Within ninety days after a designation by the Chief Water Officer of a river basin, subbasin, or reach as overappropriated, a natural resources district that encompasses any of the hydrologically connected area designated by the Chief Water Officer may hold one or more public hearings on the question of whether to terminate the stays on (a) the construction of new water wells within all or part of its portion of the hydrologically connected area, (b) the issuance of new water well construction permits in such area, or (c) the increase in ground water irrigated acres in such area. Notice of any hearing for such purpose shall be provided pursuant to section 46-743. Prior to the scheduling of a natural resources district hearing on the question of whether to terminate any such stay, the Chief Water Officer and the affected natural resources district shall consult with any irrigation district, reclamation district, public power and irrigation district, mutual irrigation company, canal company, or municipality that relies on water from the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach and with other water users and stakeholders as deemed appropriate by the Chief Water Officer or the natural resources district.

(11) Any stay issued pursuant to this section shall remain in effect until (a) the stay has been terminated pursuant to subsection (5), (7), or (10) of this section, (b) an integrated management plan for the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach has been adopted by the Chief Water Officer and the affected natural resources districts and has taken effect, (c) an integrated management plan for the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach has been adopted by the Interrelated Water Review Board and has taken effect, (d) the Chief Water Officer has completed a reevaluation pursuant to subsection (2) of section 46-713 and has determined that the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach is not fully appropriated or overappropriated, or (e) the stay expires pursuant to this subsection. Such stay may be imposed initially for not more than three years following the Chief Water Officer's designation of the river basin, subbasin, or reach as overappropriated or the Chief Water Officer's final determination that a river basin, subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated and may be extended thereafter on an annual basis by agreement of the Chief Water Officer and the affected natural resources district for not more than two additional years if necessary to allow the development, adoption, and implementation of an integrated management plan pursuant to sections 46-715 to 46-719.

(12)(a) For purposes of this subsection, (i) a status change occurs when a preliminary or final determination that a river basin, subbasin, or reach is fully appropriated is reversed by the Chief Water Officer or by judicial determination and such river basin, subbasin, or reach is determined not to be fully appropriated and (ii) the hydrologically connected area means the geographic area within which the Chief Water Officer considers surface water and ground water in such river basin, subbasin, or reach to be hydrologically connected.

(b) If a status change occurs, any stays previously in force by the Chief Water Officer or affected natural resources districts shall remain in force until the stays imposed under this subsection are in place and the Chief Water Officer shall place an immediate stay on the issuance of any new natural-flow, storage, or storage-use appropriations in the river basin, subbasin, or reach. The Chief Water Officer shall also provide prompt notice of the status change in accordance with subsection (1) of this section. Immediately upon receipt of the notice by the affected natural resources district, there shall be stays imposed as set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, subject to the exceptions set forth in subsection (3) of this section. The stays imposed pursuant to this subsection shall remain in effect within each affected natural resources district until such district adopts rules and regulations in accordance with subdivision (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection.

(c) Upon receipt of notice of a status change, each affected natural resources district shall adopt rules and regulations within one hundred twenty days after receipt of such notice for the prioritization and granting of water well permits within the hydrologically connected area for the four-year period following the status change. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to supersede the authority provided to natural resources districts under subsection (2) of section 46-707 and subdivisions (1)(f) and (1)(m) of section 46-739.

(d) The rules and regulations adopted by each affected natural resources district in accordance with subdivision (c) of this subsection shall (i) allow a limited number of total new ground water irrigated acres annually, (ii) be created with the purpose of maintaining the status of not fully appropriated based on the most recent basin determination, (iii) be for a term of not less than four years, and (iv) limit the number of new permits so that total new ground water irrigated acres do not exceed the number set in the rules and regulations. The Chief Water Officer shall approve the proposed new number of ground water irrigated acres within sixty days after approval by the natural resources district if such district meets the conditions set forth in subdivision (d)(ii) of this subsection, based on the most recent basin determination.

(e) If the proposed new number of acres is not approved by the Chief Water Officer within the applicable time period as provided in subdivision (d) of this subsection, the affected natural resources districts shall adopt rules and regulations that allow water well permits to be issued that will result in no more than two thousand five hundred irrigated acres or that will result in an increase of not more than twenty percent of all historically irrigated acres within the hydrologically connected area of each natural resources district within the affected river basin, subbasin, or reach, whichever is less, for each calendar year of the four-year period following the date of the determination described in this subsection. Each affected natural resources district may, after the initial four-year period has expired, annually determine whether water well permit limitations should continue and may enforce such limitations.

(f) During the four-year period following the status change, the Chief Water Officer shall ensure that any new appropriation granted will not cause the basin, subbasin, or reach to be fully appropriated based on the most recent basin determination. The Chief Water Officer, pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act, shall not issue new natural flow surface water appropriations for irrigation, within the river basin, subbasin, or reach affected by the status change, that will result in a net increase of more than eight hundred thirty-four irrigated acres in each natural resources district during each calendar year of the four-year period following the date of the determination described in this subsection.

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 54;

Laws 2006, LB 1226, § 24;

Laws 2009, LB54, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB483, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 213.

Environmental Protection Act, see section 81-1532.

Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act, see section 46-650.